test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_majemus_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - majemuš: # to be checked
    majemuš+A+Sg+Nom: majemuš
    majemuš+A+Sg+Gen: majemuu
    majemuš+A+Sg+Acc: majemuu
    majemuš+A+Sg+Ill: majemužân
    majemuš+A+Sg+Loc: majemuust
    majemuš+A+Sg+Com: majemuin
    majemuš+A+Sg+Abe: majemuuttáá
    majemuš+A+Ess: majemužžân
    majemuš+A+Par: majemužžâd
    majemuš+A+Pl+Nom: majemuuh
    majemuš+A+Pl+Gen: majemui
    majemuš+A+Pl+Acc: majemuid
    majemuš+A+Pl+Ill: majemuid
    majemuš+A+Pl+Loc: majemuin
    majemuš+A+Pl+Com: majemuiguin
    majemuš+A+Pl+Abe: majemuittáá
    
  Adjective - ucemuš: # to be checked
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Nom: ucemuš
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Gen: ucemuu
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Acc: ucemuu
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Ill: ucemužân
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Loc: ucemuust
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Com: ucemuin
    ucemuš+A+Sg+Abe: ucemuuttáá
    ucemuš+A+Ess: ucemužžân
    ucemuš+A+Par: ucemužžâd
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Nom: ucemuuh
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Gen: ucemui
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Acc: ucemuid
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Ill: ucemuid
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Loc: ucemuin
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Com: ucemuiguin
    ucemuš+A+Pl+Abe: ucemuittáá  
   
 
